Utah statutes.
20A-11-1403.   Prohibition of required contributions for political purposes.

A labor organization may not require any contribution to a candidate, personal campaign committee, political action committee, political issues committee, registered political party, ballot proposition, or political fund as a condition of membership or participation in the labor organization.

